Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 325.20, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 342, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 325.20), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15545 TJ 12/11/25





Req. No. 15545 Page 1